North Carolina statutes. Chapter 163. Elections and Election Laws.
Article 20. Absentee Ballot.
§ 163-230.1.
Simultaneous issuance of absentee ballots with application.

Written Request. — A qualified voter who is eligible to vote by absentee ballot under

G.S. 163-226

, or that voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian, shall complete a request form for an absentee application and absentee ballots so that the county board of elections receives that completed request form
not later than 5:00 P.M. on the Tuesday before the election. That completed written request form shall be in compliance with

G.S. 163-230.2

. The county board of elections shall enter in the register of absentee requests, applications, and ballots issued the information required in

G.S. 163-228

as soon as each item of that information becomes available. Upon receiving the completed request form, the county board of elections shall cause to be mailed to that voter a single package that includes all of the
following:

The official ballots the voter is entitled to vote.

A container-return envelope for the ballots, printed in accordance with

G.S. 163-229

.

An instruction sheet.

A clear statement of the requirement for a photocopy of identification described in G.S. 163-166.16(a) or an affidavit as described in G.S. 163-166.16(d)(1), (d)(2), or (d)(3) with the returned ballot. (a1) Mailing of Application and Ballots. — The ballots,
envelope, and instructions shall be mailed to the voter by the county board’s chair, member, officer, or employee as determined by the board and entered in the register as provided by this Article.

Absence for Sickness or Physical Disability. — Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, if a voter expects to be unable to go to the voting place to vote in person on election day because of that voter’s sickness or other physical
disability, that voter or that voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian may make the request for absentee ballots in person to the board of elections of the county in which the voter is registered after 5:00 p.m. on the
Tuesday before the election but not later than 5:00 p.m. on the day before the election. The county board of elections shall treat that completed request form in the same manner as a request under subsection (a) of this section
but may personally deliver the application and ballots to the voter or that voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian, and shall enter in the register of absentee requests, applications, and ballots issued the information
required in

G.S. 163-228

as soon as each item of that information becomes available. The county board of elections shall personally deliver to the requester in a single package:

The official ballots the voter is entitled to vote.

A container-return envelope for the ballots, printed in accordance with

G.S. 163-229

.

An instruction sheet.

A clear statement of the requirement for a photocopy of identification described in G.S. 163-166.16(a) or an affidavit as described in G.S. 163-166.16(d)(1), (d)(2), or (d)(3) with the returned application and voted ballots.

Delivery of Absentee Ballots and Container-Return Envelope to Applicant. — When the county board of elections receives a completed request form for applications and absentee ballots from the voter, or the near relative or the verifiable legal guardian
of that voter, the county board shall promptly issue and transmit them to the voter in accordance with the following instructions:

On the top margin of each ballot the applicant is entitled to vote, the chair, a member, officer, or employee of the board of elections shall write or type the words “Absentee Ballot No. _______________ ” or an abbreviation approved by the State Board
and insert in the blank space the number assigned the applicant’s application in the register of absentee requests, applications, and ballots issued. That person shall not write, type, or print any other matter upon the
ballots transmitted to the absentee voter. Alternatively, the board of elections may cause to be barcoded on the ballot the voter’s application number, if that barcoding system is approved by the State Board.

The chair, member, officer, or employee of the board of elections shall fold and place the ballots (identified in accordance with the preceding instruction) in a container-return envelope and write or type in the appropriate blanks thereon, in accordance
with the terms of G.S. 163-229(b), the absentee voter’s name, the absentee voter’s application number, and the designation of the precinct in which the voter is registered. If the ballot is barcoded under this section,
the envelope may be barcoded rather than having the actual number appear. The person placing the ballots in the envelopes shall leave the container-return envelope holding the ballots unsealed.

The chair, member, officer, or employee of the board of elections shall then place the unsealed container-return envelope holding the ballots together with printed instructions for voting and returning the ballots, in an envelope addressed to the voter
at the post office address stated in the request, seal the envelope, and mail it at the expense of the county board of elections: Provided, that in case of a request received after 5:00 p.m. on the Tuesday before the election
under the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, in lieu of transmitting the ballots to the voter in person or by mail, the chair, member, officer, or employee of the board of elections may deliver the sealed envelope
containing the instruction sheet and the container-return envelope holding the ballots to a near relative or verifiable legal guardian of the voter.The county board of elections may receive completed written request forms
for applications at any time prior to the election but shall not mail applications and ballots to the voter or issue applications and ballots in person earlier than 60 days prior to the statewide general election in an
even-numbered year, or earlier than 50 days prior to any other election, except as provided in

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6. No election official shall issue applications for absentee ballots except in compliance with this Article.

Voter to Complete. — The application shall be completed and signed by the voter personally, the ballots marked, the ballots sealed in the container-return envelope, and the certificate completed as provided in

G.S. 163-231

.

Approval of Applications. — At its next official meeting after return of the completed container-return envelope with the voter’s ballots, the county board of elections shall determine whether the container-return envelope has been properly executed.
If the board determines that the container-return envelope has been properly executed, it shall approve the application and deposit the container-return envelope with other container-return envelopes for the envelope to be opened
and the ballots counted at the same time as all other container-return envelopes and absentee ballots.

Required Meeting of County Board of Elections. — During the period commencing on the fifth Tuesday before an election, in which absentee ballots are authorized, the county board of elections shall hold one or more public meetings each Tuesday at 5:00
p.m. for the purpose of action on applications for absentee ballots. At these meetings, the county board of elections shall pass upon applications for absentee ballots.If the county board of elections changes the time of holding
its meetings or provides for additional meetings in accordance with the terms of this subsection, notice of the change in hour and notice of the schedule of additional meetings, if any, shall be published in a newspaper circulated
in the county at least 30 days prior to the election.At the time the county board of elections makes its decision on an application for absentee ballots, the board shall enter in the appropriate column in the register of absentee
requests, applications, and ballots issued opposite the name of the applicant a notation of whether the applicant’s application was “Approved” or “Disapproved”.The decision of the board on the validity of an application for absentee
ballots shall be final subject only to such review as may be necessary in the event of an election contest. The county board of elections shall constitute the proper official body to pass upon the validity of all applications for
absentee ballots received in the county; this function shall not be performed by the chair or any other member of the board individually.

(f1)
Each container-return envelope returned to the county board with application and voted ballots under this section shall be accompanied by a photocopy of identification described in G.S. 163-166.16(a) or an affidavit
as described in G.S. 163-166.16(d)(1), (d)(2), or (d)(3).

Rules. — The State Board, by rule or by instruction to the county board of elections, shall establish procedures to provide appropriate safeguards in the implementation of this section. The State Board shall adopt rules to provide for the forms of identification
that shall be included with returned application and voted ballots. At a minimum, the rules shall include the following:

Acceptable photocopies of forms of readable identification, as described in G.S. 163-166.16(a).

A process for a voter without acceptable photocopies of forms of readable identification under subdivision (1) of this subsection to complete an alternative affidavit in accordance with G.S. 163-166.16(d)(1), (d)(2), or (d)(3) that includes inability
to attach a physical copy of the voter’s identification with the written request as a reasonable impediment to compliance with the identification requirement. If a reasonable impediment under this subdivision states inability
to attach a physical copy of the voter’s identification with the written request, the reasonable impediment shall include one of the following:

The number of the voter’s North Carolina drivers license issued under Article 2 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes, including a learner’s permit or a provisional license.

The number of the voter’s special identification card for nonoperators issued under

G.S. 20-37.7

.

The last four digits of the voter’s social security number.

Recodified as G.S. 163-226(f) by Session Laws 2019-239, s. 1.2(a), effective January 1, 2020, and applicable to elections conducted on or after that date.

History.
1983, c. 304, s. 1; 1985, c. 759, ss. 5.1-5.5; 1991, c. 727, s. 6.3; 1993, c. 553, s. 67; 1995, c. 243, s. 1; 1999-455, s. 10; 2001-337, s. 3; 2002-159, s. 55(m); 2009-537, s. 5; 2013-381, s. 4.2; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144,
s. 3.4(i); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 1.2(a), (b); 2020-17, s. 4.

§ 163-230.2.
Method of requesting absentee ballots.

Valid Types of Written Requests. — A completed written request form for absentee ballots as required by

G.S. 163-230.1

is valid only if it is on a form created by the State Board and signed by the voter requesting absentee ballots or that voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian. The State Board shall make the blank request
form available at its offices, online, and in each county board of elections office, and that blank request form may be reproduced. A voter may call the State Board of Elections or a county board of elections office and request
that the blank request form be sent to the voter by mail, e-mail, or fax. The request form created by the State Board shall require at least the following information:

The name and address of the residence of the voter.

The name and address of the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian if that individual is making the request.

The address of the voter to which the application and absentee ballots are to be mailed if different from the residence address of the voter.

One of the following:

The number of the applicant’s North Carolina drivers license issued under Article 2 of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes, including a learner’s permit or a provisional license.

The number of the applicant’s special identification card for nonoperators issued under

G.S. 20-37.7

.

The last four digits of the applicant’s social security number.

The voter’s date of birth.

The signature of the voter or of the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian if that individual is making the request.

A clear indicator of the date the election generating the request is to be held, except for annual calendar year requests in accordance with G.S. 163-226(b).

Request to Update Voter Registration. — A completed request form for absentee ballots shall be deemed a request to update the official record of voter registration for that voter and shall be confirmed in writing in accordance with

G.S. 163-82.14(d)

.

Return of Request. — The completed request form for absentee ballots shall be delivered to the county board of elections only by any of the following:

The voter.

The voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian.

A member of a multipartisan team trained and authorized by the county board of elections pursuant to

G.S. 163-226.3

.

Confirmation of Voter Registration. — Upon receiving a completed request form for absentee ballots, the county board shall confirm that voter’s registration. If that voter is confirmed as a registered voter of the county, the absentee ballots and certification
form shall be mailed to the voter, unless personally delivered in accordance with G.S. 163-230.1(b). If the voter’s official record of voter registration conflicts with the completed request form for absentee ballots or cannot
be confirmed, the voter shall be so notified. If the county board cannot resolve the differences, no application or absentee ballots shall be issued.

Invalid Types of Written Requests. — If a county board of elections receives a request for absentee ballots that does not comply with this subsection or subsection (a) of this section, the board shall not issue an application and ballots under

G.S. 163-230.1

. A request for absentee ballots is not valid if any of the following apply:

The completed written request is not on a form created by the State Board.

The completed written request is completed, partially or in whole, or signed by anyone other than the voter, or the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian. A member of a multipartisan team trained and authorized by the county board of elections
pursuant to

G.S. 163-226.3

may assist in completion of the request.

The written request does not contain all of the information required by subsection (a) of this section.

The completed written request is returned to the county board by someone other than a person listed in subsection (c) of this section, the United States Postal Service, or a designated delivery service authorized pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 7502(f)(2). (e1)
Assistance by Others. — If a voter is in need of assistance completing the written request form due to blindness, disability, or inability to read or write and there is not a near relative or legal guardian available to
assist that voter, the voter may request some other person to give assistance, notwithstanding any other provision of this section. If another person gives assistance in completing the written request form, that person’s
name and address shall be disclosed on the written request form in addition to the information listed in subsection (a) of this section.

Rules by State Board. — The State Board shall adopt rules for the enforcement of this section.

History.
2002-159, s. 57(a); 2013-381, s. 4.3; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 1.2(e); 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 1.3(a); 2020-17, s. 5.

§ 163-230.3.
Online request for absentee ballots.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 163-230.1

and

G.S. 163-230.2

, a qualified voter who is eligible to vote by absentee ballot under

G.S. 163-226

, or that voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian, may submit a request for absentee ballots online using the procedures set forth in this section in lieu of the completed written request on a form established
by the State Board. All other provisions in

G.S. 163-230.1

and

G.S. 163-230.2

shall apply.

The State Board shall establish a secure Internet Web site to permit individuals described in subsection (a) of this section to submit an online request for absentee ballots. The Internet Web site must be able to track the IP address of anyone who accesses
the Web site. The Web site must require that the voter or the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian provide all of the following information:

All information required for a valid written request for absentee ballots in

G.S. 163-230.2

.

An electronic signature, as defined in

G.S. 66-312

of the Uniform Electronic Transaction Act, of the voter, or the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal guardian, if requesting on the voter’s behalf.

Upon receipt of an online request for absentee ballots, the State Board shall submit the request to the county board of elections in which the voter resides. The county board of elections shall process the online request in the same manner as processing
a completed written request for absentee ballots submitted under

G.S. 163-230.1

.

History.
2020-17, s. 7(a).

§ 163-231.
Voting absentee ballots and transmitting them to the county board of elections.

Procedure for Voting Absentee Ballots. — In the presence of two persons who are at least 18 years of age, and who are not disqualified by G.S. 163-226.3(a)(4) or

G.S. 163-237(c)

, the voter shall do all of the following:

Mark the voter’s ballots, or cause them to be marked by that person in the voter’s presence according to the voter’s instruction.

Fold each ballot separately, or cause each of them to be folded in the voter’s presence.

Place the folded ballots in the container-return envelope and securely seal it, or have this done in the voter’s presence.

Make the application printed on the container-return envelope according to the provisions of G.S. 163-229(b) and make the certificate printed on the container-return envelope according to the provisions of G.S. 163-229(b).

Require those two persons in whose presence the voter marked that voter’s ballots to sign the application and certificate as witnesses and to indicate those persons’ addresses. Failure to list a ZIP code does not invalidate the application and certificate.

Do one of the following:

Have the application notarized. The notary public may be the person in whose presence the voter marked that voter’s ballot.

Have the two persons in whose presence the voter marked that voter’s ballots to certify that the voter is the registered voter submitting the marked ballots.Alternatively to the prior paragraph of this subsection, any requirement for two witnesses shall
be satisfied if witnessed by one notary public, who shall comply with all the other requirements of that paragraph. The notary shall affix a valid notarial seal to the envelope, and include the word “Notary Public”
below his or her signature.The persons in whose presence the ballot is marked shall at all times respect the secrecy of the ballot and the privacy of the absentee voter, unless the voter requests assistance and
that person is otherwise authorized by law to give assistance. When thus executed, the sealed container-return envelope, with the ballots enclosed, shall be transmitted in accordance with the provisions of subsection
(b) of this section to the county board of elections which issued the ballots.

Transmitting Executed Absentee Ballots to County Board of Elections. — The sealed container-return envelope in which executed absentee ballots have been placed shall be transmitted to the county board of elections who issued those ballots as follows:

All ballots issued under the provisions of this Article and Article 21A of this Chapter shall be transmitted by mail or by commercial courier service, at the voter’s expense, or delivered in person, or by the voter’s near relative or verifiable legal
guardian and received by the county board not later than 5:00 p.m. on the day of the statewide primary or general election or county bond election. Ballots issued under the provisions of Article 21A of this Chapter may
also be electronically transmitted.

If ballots are received later than the hour stated in subdivision (1) of this subsection, those ballots shall not be accepted unless one of the following applies:

Federal law so requires.

The ballots issued under this Article are postmarked and that postmark is dated on or before the day of the statewide primary or general election or county bond election and are received by the county board of elections not later than three days after
the election by 5:00 p.m.

The ballots issued under Article 21A of this Chapter are received by the county board of elections not later than the end of business on the business day before the canvass conducted by the county board of elections held pursuant to

G.S. 163-182.5

.

For purposes of this section, “Delivered in person” includes delivering the ballot to an election official at a one-stop voting site under

G.S. 163-227.2

, 163-227.5, and 163-227.6 during any time that site is open for voting. The ballots shall be kept securely and delivered by election officials at that site to the county board of elections office for processing.

History.
1939, c. 159, ss. 2, 5; 1941, c. 248; 1943, c. 736; c. 751, s. 1; 1945, c. 758, s. 5; 1963, c. 457, ss. 2, 5; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1971, c. 1247, s. 3; 1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1979, c. 799, s. 5; 1985, c.
562, ss. 1, 2; 1987, c. 583, ss. 1, 2; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 991, s. 4; 1999-455, s. 11; 2009-537, ss. 6, 8(a); 2011-182, s. 5; 2013-381, s. 4.4; 2014-111, s. 11; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-144, s. 3.4(j); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b),
4.8.

§ 163-232.
Certified list of executed absentee ballots; distribution of list.

The county board of elections shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, a list in at least quadruplicate, of all absentee ballots returned to the county board of elections to be counted, which have been approved by the county board of elections, and which
have been received as of 5:00 p.m. on the day before the election. At the end of the list, the chair shall execute the following certificate under oath:“State of North CarolinaCounty of _______________ I, _______________ , chair
of the _______________ County board of elections, do hereby certify that the foregoing is a list of all executed absentee ballots to be voted in the election to be conducted on the _______________ day of _______________ ,
_______________ , which have been approved by the county board of elections and which have been returned no later than 5:00 p.m. on the day before the election. I certify that the chair, member, officer, or employee of the board
of elections has not delivered ballots for absentee voting to any person other than the voter, by mail or by commercial courier service or in person, except as provided by law, and have not mailed or delivered ballots when the
request for the ballot was received after the deadline provided by law.This the _______________ day of _______________ , _______________ _______________ (Signature of chair of county board of elections)Sworn to and subscribed
before me this _______________ day of _______________ , _______________ .Witness my hand and official seal. _______________ (Signature of officer administering oath) _______________ (Title of officer)”

No later than 10:00 a.m. on election day, the county board of elections shall cause one copy of the list of executed absentee ballots, which may be a continuing countywide list or a separate list for each precinct, to be immediately (i) submitted electronically
in a manner approved by the State Board of Elections or (ii) deposited as “first-class” mail to the State Board of Elections. The board shall retain one copy in the board office for public inspection and the board shall cause two
copies of the appropriate precinct list to be delivered to the chief judge of each precinct in the county. The county board of elections shall be authorized to call upon the sheriff of the county to distribute the list to the precincts.
In addition the county board of elections shall, upon request, provide a copy of the complete list to the chair of each political party, recognized under the provisions of

G.S. 163-96

, represented in the county.The chief judge shall post one copy of the list immediately in a conspicuous location in the voting place and retain one copy until all challenges of absentee ballots have been heard by
the county board of elections. Challenges shall be made to absentee ballots as provided in

G.S. 163-96

.

After receipt of the list of absentee voters required by this section the chief judge shall call the name of each person recorded on the list and enter an “A” in the appropriate voting square on the voter’s permanent registration record, or a similar
entry on the computer list used at the polls. If such person is already recorded as having voted in that election, the chief judge shall enter a challenge which shall be presented to the county board of elections for resolution
by the board of elections prior to certification of results by the board.

All lists required by this section shall be retained by the county board of elections for a period of 22 months after which they may then be destroyed.

History.
1939, c. 159, s. 6; 1943, c. 751, s. 3; 1963, c. 457, s. 6; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1981, c. 155, s. 1; c. 305, s. 4; 1985, c. 600, s. 7; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 762, s. 54; 1999-455,
s. 12; 1999-456, s. 59; 2015-103, s. 3(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-232.1.
Certified list of executed absentee ballots received on or after election day; publication of list.

The county board of elections shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, a list in at least triplicate, of all absentee ballots issued under Article 20 of this Chapter returned to the county board of elections to be counted, which have been approved by the
county board of elections, have not been included on the certified list prepared pursuant to

G.S. 163-232

, and which have been postmarked by the day of the statewide primary or general election or county bond election and received by the county board of elections not later than three days after the election by 5:00
p.m. The list shall be supplemented with new information each business day following the day of the election until the deadline for receipt of such absentee ballots. At the end of the list, the chairman shall execute the following
certificate under oath: Click to view

The county board of elections shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, a list in at least triplicate, of all military-overseas ballots issued under Article 21A of this Chapter and returned to the county board of elections to be counted, which have been
approved by the county board of elections, have not been included on the certified list prepared pursuant to

G.S. 163-232

, and which have been received by the county board of elections not later than three days after the election by 5:00 p.m. The list shall be supplemented with new information each business day following the day of
the election until the deadline for receipt of such absentee ballots. At the end of the list, the chair shall execute the following certificate under oath: Click to view

The board shall post one copy of the most current version of each list in the board office in a conspicuous location for public inspection and shall retain one copy until all challenges of absentee ballots have been heard by the county board of elections.
The county board of elections shall cause one copy of each of the final lists of executed absentee ballots required under subsection (a) and subsection (b) of this section to be (i) submitted electronically in a manner approved
by the State Board of Elections or (ii) deposited as “first-class” mail to the State Board of Elections. The final lists shall be electronically submitted or mailed no later than 10:00 a.m. of the next business day following the
deadline for receipt of such absentee ballots. Challenges shall be made to absentee ballots as provided in

G.S. 163-89

. In addition the county board of elections shall, upon request, provide a copy of each of the lists to the chair of each political party, recognized under the provisions of

G.S. 163-96

, represented in the county.

All lists required by this section shall be retained by the county board of elections for a period of 22 months after which they may then be destroyed.

“State of North Carolina County of I, , chairman of the County Board of Elections, do hereby certify that the foregoing is a list of all executed absentee ballots to be voted in the election to be conducted on the day of , which have been approved by
the county board of elections and which have been postmarked by the day of the statewide primary or general election or county bond election and received by the county board of elections not later than three days after the election
by 5:00 p.m. I certify that the chairman, member, officer, or employee of the board of elections has not delivered ballots for absentee voting to any person other than the voter, by mail or by commercial courier service or in person,
except as provided by law, and have not mailed or delivered ballots when the request for the ballot was received after the deadline provided by law. This the day of , (Signature of chairman of county board of elections) Sworn to and
subscribed before me this day of , . Witness my hand and official seal. (Signature of officer administering oath) (Title of officer)’’

“State of North Carolina County of I, , chair of the County Board of Elections, do hereby certify that the foregoing is a list of all executed military-overseas ballots to be voted in the election to be conducted on the day of , , which have been approved
by the county board of elections, and which have been postmarked by the day of the statewide primary or general election or county bond election and received by the county board of elections not later than three days after the election
by 5:00 p.m. I further certify that I have issued ballots to no other persons than those listed herein and further that I have not delivered military-overseas ballots to persons other than those listed herein; that this list constitutes
the only precinct registration of covered voters whose names have not heretofore been entered on the regular registration of the appropriate precinct. This the day of , (Signature of chair of county board of elections) Sworn to and
subscribed before me this day of , . Witness my hand and official seal. (Signature of officer administering oath) (Title of officer)’’

History.
2009-537, s. 8(b); 2011-182, s. 6; 2015-103, s. 3(b); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 163-233.
Applications for absentee ballots; how retained.

The county board of elections shall retain, in a safe place, the original of all applications made for absentee ballots, which shall be available to inspection by the State Board or to any person upon the directive of the State Board. Any copies of any
photographic identification associated with the absentee ballots shall not be a public record.

The county board of elections shall create a list of applications made for absentee ballots received by the county board, which shall be updated daily from the date the county board begins to mail application and ballots through the date of canvass. Such
list shall be a public record.

All applications for absentee ballots shall be retained by the county board of elections for a period of one year after which those applications may be destroyed.

History.
1939, c. 159, s. 7; 1943, c. 751, s. 4; 1963, c. 457, s. 7; 1967, c. 775, s. 1; 1973, c. 536, s. 1; c. 1075, s. 5; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 1999-455, s. 13; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b); 2019-239, s. 1.1(b).

Cross References.

For present provisions covering the subject matter of this section as it existed prior to the 1977 amendment, see

G.S. 163-232

.

§ 163-233.1.
Withdrawal of absentee ballots not allowed.

No person shall be permitted to withdraw an absentee ballot after such ballot has been mailed to or returned to the county board of elections.

History.
1973, c. 536, s. 1; 1977, c. 469, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).